Utah statutes.
78B-15-308.   Procedure for rescission or challenge.

(1)  Every signatory to a declaration of paternity and any related denial of paternity must be made a party to a proceeding to rescind or challenge the declaration or denial.

(2)  For the purpose of rescission of, or challenge to, a declaration of paternity or denial of paternity, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction of this state by signing the declaration or denial, effective upon the filing of the document with the Office of Vital Records.

(3)  Except for good cause shown, during the pendency of a proceeding to rescind or challenge a declaration of paternity or denial of paternity, the tribunal may not suspend the legal responsibilities of a signatory arising from the declaration, including the duty to pay child support.

(4)  A proceeding to rescind or to challenge a declaration of paternity or denial of paternity must be conducted in the same manner as a proceeding to adjudicate parentage under Part 6, Adjudication of Parentage.

(5)  At the conclusion of a proceeding to rescind or challenge a declaration of paternity or denial of paternity, the tribunal shall order the Office of Vital Records to amend the birth record of the child, if appropriate.

(6)  If the declaration is rescinded, the declarant father may not recover child support he paid prior to the entry of an order of rescission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

